test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-nipa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - nipâ - help : # Ordinary VAI verb - full paradigm
     
     nipâ+V+IA+Imp+Imm+2Sg: nipân
     nipâ+V+IA+Imp+Imm+2Pl: nipâk
     nipâ+V+IA+Imp+Imm+12Pl: nipâtân
     
     nipâ+V+IA+Imp+Del+2Sg: nipâhkan
     nipâ+V+IA+Imp+Del+2Pl: nipâhkêk
     nipâ+V+IA+Imp+Del+12Pl: nipâhkahk
     
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prs+1Sg: ninipân
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prs+2Sg: kinipân
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3Sg: nipâw
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3oSg: nipâyiwa
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prs+1Pl: ninipânân
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prs+12Pl: kinipânaw
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prs+2Pl: kinipânâwâw
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3Pl: nipâwak
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3oPl: nipâyiwa

     nipâ+V+IA+Cnj+1Sg: ê-nipâyân
     nipâ+V+IA+Cnj+1Sg: ênipâyân
     nipâ+V+IA+Cnj+2Sg: ê-nipâyan
     nipâ+V+IA+Cnj+2Sg: ênipâyan
     nipâ+V+IA+Cnj+3Sg: ê-nipât
     nipâ+V+IA+Cnj+3Sg: ênipât
     nipâ+V+IA+Cnj+3oSg: ê-nipâyit
     nipâ+V+IA+Cnj+3oSg: ênipâyit
     nipâ+V+IA+Cnj+1Pl: ê-nipâyâhk
     nipâ+V+IA+Cnj+1Pl: ênipâyâhk
     nipâ+V+IA+Cnj+12Pl: ê-nipâyahk
     nipâ+V+IA+Cnj+12Pl: ênipâyahk
     nipâ+V+IA+Cnj+2Pl: ê-nipânyêk
     nipâ+V+IA+Cnj+2Pl: ênipânyêk
     nipâ+V+IA+Cnj+3Pl: ê-nipâcik
     nipâ+V+IA+Cnj+3Pl: ênipâcik

     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prt+1Sg: nikî-nipân
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prt+2Sg: kikî-nipân
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prt+3Sg: kî-nipâw
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prt+3oSg: kî-nipâyiwa
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prt+1Pl: nikî-nipânân
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prt+12Pl: kikî-nipânaw
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prt+2Pl: kikî-nipânâwâw
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prt+3Pl: kînipâwak
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prt+3oPl: kî-nipâyiwa			







     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: niatoskahâw
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: kiatoskahâw
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+3SgO: [atoskahêw, atoskahik, atoskahkow]
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3oSg+3SgO: [atoskahêyiwa, atoskahikoyiwa]

     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: niatoskahânân
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: kiatoskahânaw
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: kiatoskahâwâw
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+3SgO: [atoskahêwak, atoskahkow]
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3oPl+3SgO: atoskahêyiwa
	 nipâ
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+3PlO: niatoskahâwak
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+3PlO: kiatoskahâwak
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+3PlO: [atoskahêw, atoskahikowak, atoskahikak]
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3oSg+3PlO: atoskahêyiwa
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3oSg+3oPlO: atoskahikoyiwa
	 nipâ
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+3PlO: niatoskahânânak
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+3PlO: kiatoskahânawak
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+3PlO: kiatoskahâwâwak
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+3PlO: atoskahikowak
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+3PlO: atoskahêwak
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3oPl+3PlO: atoskahêyiwa
	 nipâ
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+1SgO: niatoskahik
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+2SgO: kiatoskahik
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+1PlO: niatoskahikonân
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+12PlO: kiatoskahikonaw
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+2PlO: kiatoskahikowâw
     nipâ
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+1SgO: niatoskahikwak
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+2SgO: kiatoskahikwak
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+1PlO: niatoskahikonânak
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+12PlO: kiatoskahikonawak
     nipâ+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+2PlO: kiatoskahikowâwak
     nipâ
     nipâ+V+IA+Cnj+1Sg+3SgO: ê-atoskahak
     nipâ+V+IA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO: ê-atoskahakik
     nipâ+V+IA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO: ê-atoskahâyâhk
     nipâ+V+IA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO: ê-atoskahâyâhkik
     nipâ+V+IA+Cnj+12Pl+3SgO: ê-atoskahâyâhk
     nipâ+V+IA+Cnj+12Pl+3PlO: ê-atoskahâyâhkok
     nipâ
     nipâ+V+IA+Cnj+2Sg+3SgO: ê-atoskahat
     nipâ+V+IA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: ê-atoskahacik
     nipâ+V+IA+Cnj+2Pl+3SgO: ê-atoskahâyêk
     nipâ+V+IA+Cnj+2Pl+3PlO: ê-atoskahâyêkok
	 nipâ
     nipâ+V+IA+Cnj+3Pl+3oPlO: ê-atoskahikocik
     nipâ+V+IA+Cnj+3Pl+3SgO: ê-atoskahâcik
     nipâ+V+IA+Cnj+3Pl+3PlO: ê-atoskahâcik
     nipâ+V+IA+Cnj+3Pl+2SgO: ê-atoskahiskik
     nipâ+V+IA+Cnj+3Pl+2PlO: ê-atoskahikoyêkok
     nipâ+V+IA+Cnj+3Pl+1SgO: ê-atoskahicik
     nipâ+V+IA+Cnj+3Pl+1PlO: ê-atoskahikoyâhkik
     nipâ+V+IA+Cnj+3Pl+12PlO: ê-atoskahikoyâhkok

     atoskah+V+IA+Cnj+3Sg+3oPlO: ê-atoskahikocik
     atoskah+V+IA+Cnj+3Sg+3SgO: ê-atoskahât
     atoskah+V+IA+Cnj+3Sg+3PlO: ê-atoskahât
     atoskah+V+IA+Cnj+3Sg+2SgO: ê-atoskahisk
     atoskah+V+IA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO: ê-atoskahikoyêk
     atoskah+V+IA+Cnj+3Sg+1SgO: ê-atoskahit
     atoskah+V+IA+Cnj+3Sg+1PlO: ê-atoskahikoyâhk
     atoskah+V+IA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO: ê-atoskahikoyahk

     atoskah+V+IA+Cnj+3oPl+3oSgO: ê-atoskahkoyit
     atoskah+V+IA+Cnj+3oPl+3oPlO: ê-atoskahikoyit
     atoskah+V+IA+Cnj+3oPl+3SgO: ê-atoskahkot
     atoskah+V+IA+Cnj+3oPl+3SgO: ê-atoskahikot
     atoskah+V+IA+Cnj+3oPl+3PlO: ê-atoskahikocik

     atoskah+V+IA+Cnj+3oSg+3oSgO: ê-atoskahkoyit
     atoskah+V+IA+Cnj+3oSg+3oPlO: ê-atoskahikoyit
     atoskah+V+IA+Cnj+3oSg+3SgO: ê-atoskahkot
     atoskah+V+IA+Cnj+3oSg+3SgO: ê-atoskahikot
     atoskah+V+IA+Cnj+3oSg+3PlO: ê-atoskahikocik


     atoskah+V+IA+Fut+1Sg+3SgO: atoskahaki
     atoskah+V+IA+Fut+1Sg+3PlO: atoskahakwâwi
     atoskah+V+IA+Fut+1Pl+3SgO: atoskahâyâhki
     atoskah+V+IA+Fut+1Pl+3PlO: atoskahâyâhkwâwi
     atoskah+V+IA+Fut+12Pl+3SgO: atoskahâyâhko
     atoskah+V+IA+Fut+12Pl+3PlO: atoskahâyâhkwâwi

     atoskah+V+IA+Fut+2Sg+3SgO: atoskahaci
     atoskah+V+IA+Fut+2Sg+3PlO: atoskahatwâwi
     atoskah+V+IA+Fut+2Pl+3SgO: atoskahâyêko
     atoskah+V+IA+Fut+2Pl+3PlO: atoskahâyêkwâwi

     atoskah+V+IA+Fut+3Sg+3SgO: atoskahâci
     atoskah+V+IA+Fut+3Sg+3oSgO: atoskahâyici
     atoskah+V+IA+Fut+3Sg+3PlO: atoskahikotwâwi
     atoskah+V+IA+Fut+3Sg+1SgO: atoskahici
     atoskah+V+IA+Fut+3Sg+2SgO: atoskahiski
     atoskah+V+IA+Fut+3Sg+1PlO: atoskahikoyâhki
     atoskah+V+IA+Fut+3Sg+2PlO: atoskahikoyêko
     atoskah+V+IA+Fut+3Sg+12PlO: atoskahikoyahko

     atoskah+V+IA+Fut+3Pl+3SgO: atoskahâtwâwi
     atoskah+V+IA+Fut+3Pl+3PlO: atoskahâtwâwi
     atoskah+V+IA+Fut+3Pl+3PlO: atoskahikotwâwi


     atoskah+V+IA+Fut+3oSg+3SgO: atoskahikoci
     atoskah+V+IA+Fut+3oSg+3PlO: atoskahâyici
     atoskah+V+IA+Fut+3oPl+3SgO: atoskahikoci
     atoskah+V+IA+Fut+3oPl+3PlO: atoskahâyici
     atoskah+V+IA+Fut+3oSg+3oPlO: atoskahikoyici
     atoskah+V+IA+Fut+3oPl+3oPlO: atoskahikoyici
